New Jersey, session 222, AJR161.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  There is established the New Jersey Pancreatic Cancer Commission.  The commission shall be responsible for examining pancreatic cancer in the State, including prevention, early detection, treatment, patient outcomes, and access to care.  The commissions examination shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)  the incidence, mortality rates, and stage at diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in the State; (2)  existing screening, diagnostic, and treatment practices for pancreatic cancer, including access to specialized and multidisciplinary care; (3)  barriers to early detection, timely diagnosis, and effective treatment, including insurance coverage, geographic disparities, and health equity considerations; (4)  the availability and utilization of biomarker testing, genetic testing, and precision medicine approaches for pancreatic cancer patients; (5)  current research efforts, clinical trials, and funding opportunities related to pancreatic cancer in the State; (6)  methods of educating health care providers, patients, and the public regarding pancreatic cancer risk factors, symptoms, and treatment options; (7)  supportive care needs of pancreatic cancer patients and their families, including nutrition, palliative care, and survivorship resources; and (8) recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or administrative actions to improve pancreatic cancer outcomes in the short-term and long-term. b.  The commission shall consist of 13 members, to be appointed by the Governor as follows: (1)  nine members to be appointed by the Governor including:  a representative of the Department of Health; a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State with expertise in the diagnosis or treatment of pancreatic cancer; a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State with expertise in oncology or gastrointestinal diseases; a representative of Rutgers Medical School, who is a physician engaged in cancer research or clinical practice; a representative of a New Jersey cancer research institution or academic research center with expertise in pancreatic cancer or related fields; a representative of a hospital or health care system in this State that provides multidisciplinary pancreatic cancer care; a health care professional with expertise in genetic or biomarker testing related to pancreatic cancer; a representative with expertise in health insurance coverage, reimbursement, or access to care issues affecting cancer patients; a representative of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs; and a member, who is a pancreatic cancer survivor, caregiver, or immediate family member of a pancreatic cancer patient; (2)  one member to be appointed by the President of the Senate, which member shall be a representative of a nonprofit organization with a demonstrated focus on pancreatic cancer patient advocacy or support services; (3)  two members to be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, as follows:  a representative of the New Jersey Hospital Association; and a representative of the Medical Society of New Jersey; and (4)  the Minority Leader of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the General Assembly shall each recommend one appointment for the commission to the Governor. c.  Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled as provided for the original appointments. d.  The commission shall organize as soon as practicable following the appointment of its members and shall select a chairperson from among the members.  The chairperson shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the commission. e.  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the commission within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the commission for its purposes. f.  The commission shall be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes. g.  The Department of Health shall provide staff support to the commission. h.  No later than 12 months after organization, the commission shall submit to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), a report of its findings and recommendations for legislative, executive, or any other action as may be appropriate.  The commission shall expire upon submission of its report. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This joint resolution establishes the New Jersey Pancreatic Cancer Commission (commission).  Under the resolution, the commission is to be responsible for examining pancreatic cancer in the State, including prevention, early detection, treatment, patient outcomes, and access to care.  Pancreatic cancer is a type of cancer that begins as a growth of cells in the pancreas, an organ that is responsible for making enzymes that help digest food and hormones that help manage blood sugar.  The commissions examination is to include, but is not limited to: (1) the incidence, mortality rates, and stage at diagnosis of pancreatic cancer in the State; (2) existing screening, diagnostic, and treatment practices for pancreatic cancer, including access to specialized and multidisciplinary care; (3) barriers to early detection, timely diagnosis, and effective treatment, including insurance coverage, geographic disparities, and health equity considerations; (4) the availability and utilization of biomarker testing, genetic testing, and precision medicine approaches for pancreatic cancer patients; (5) current research efforts, clinical trials, and funding opportunities related to pancreatic cancer in the State; (6) methods of educating health care providers, patients, and the public regarding pancreatic cancer risk factors, symptoms, and treatment options; (7) supportive care needs of pancreatic cancer patients and their families, including nutrition, palliative care, and survivorship resources; and (8) recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or administrative actions to improve pancreatic cancer outcomes in the short term and long term. The commission will consist of 13 members, appointed as follows: the Governor will appoint: a representative of the Department of Health; a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State with expertise in the diagnosis or treatment of pancreatic cancer; a physician licensed to practice medicine in this State with expertise in oncology or gastrointestinal diseases; a representative of Rutgers Medical School, who is a physician engaged in cancer research or clinical practice; a representative of a New Jersey cancer research institution or academic research center with expertise in pancreatic cancer or related fields; a representative of a hospital or health care system in this State that provides multidisciplinary pancreatic cancer care; a health care professional with expertise in genetic or biomarker testing related to pancreatic cancer; a representative with expertise in health insurance coverage, reimbursement, or access to care issues affecting cancer patients; a representative of the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs; and a member, who is a pancreatic cancer survivor, caregiver, or immediate family member of a pancreatic cancer patient; the President of the Senate will appoint a representative of a nonprofit organization with a demonstrated focus on pancreatic cancer patient advocacy or support services; the Speaker of the General Assembly will appoint a representative of the New Jersey Hospital Association and a representative of the Medical Society of New Jersey; and the Minority Leader of the Senate and the Minority Leader of the General Assembly will each recommend one appointment for the commission to the Governor. The resolution provides that, no later than 12 months after organization, the commission issue a report of its findings to the Governor and the Legislature, including recommendations for legislative, executive, or any other actions, as may be appropriate.  The commission will expire upon submission of the report.